en: Calipers
xx: Calipers
cs: Posuvná měřítka
da: Målelære
de: Messschieber
es: Calibradores de orificios y telescópicos
fr: Pieds à coulisse
it: Calibri
ja: ノギス
nl: Schuifmaten en buitenwerkse maten
no: Skyvelærer
pl: Suwmiarki
pt: Calibradores
ru: Штангенциркули
sv: Krumpassare
tr: Kumpaslar

en: Cruising Rods
xx: Cruising Rods
cs: Lesnické průměrky
da: Tømmermålestok
de: Kluppen
es: Pies de rey
fr: Compas
it: Calibri calcolo pezzi legno
ja: 輪尺
nl: Boommeethaken
no: Tømmermålestenger
pl: Średnicomierze do drewna
pt: Calibradores de madeira
ru: Мерные вилки
sv: Mätstickor
tr: Kereste Ölçüm Çubukları

en: Distance Meters
xx: Distance Meters
cs: Měřiče vzdálenosti
da: Afstandsmålere
de: Entfernungsmesser
es: Metros de distancia
fr: Distancemètres
it: Misuratori di distanza
ja: 距離計
nl: Afstandsmeters
no: Avstandsmålere
pl: Odległościomierze
pt: Medidores de distância
ru: Измерители расстояния
sv: Distansmätare
tr: Mesafe Ölçerler

en: Dividers
xx: Dividers
cs: Odpichovací kružítka
da: Inddelere
de: Stangenzirkel
es: Compás de puntas secas
fr: Compas droits
it: Compassi
ja: 分割コンパス
nl: Bouwpassers
no: Stikkpassere
pl: Rozdzielacze
pt: Divisores
ru: Измерительные циркули
sv: Stickpassare
tr: Pergeller

en: Electrical Testing Tools
xx: Electrical Testing Tools
cs: Elektrické zkoušečky
da: Elektriske testværktøjer
de: Elektrische Prüfgeräte
es: Herramientas para mediciones eléctricas
fr: Outils de test électrique
it: Strumenti per test elettrici
ja: 電気計器
nl: Elektrisch meetgereedschap
no: Verktøy for elektrisk testing
pl: Elektroniczne narzędzia pomiarowe
pt: Ferramentas para testes elétricos
ru: Электроизмерительные приборы
sv: Verktyg för elströmsmätning
tr: Elektrik Testi Araçları

en: Flow Meters & Controllers
xx: Flow Meters & Controllers
cs: Průtokoměry
da: Gennemstrømningsmålere
de: Durchflussmesser
es: Caudalímetros y controladores de caudal
fr: Débitmètres
it: Flussimetri e controllori
ja: 流量計・コントローラー
nl: Debietmeters en -regelaars
no: Strømningsmålere og regulatorer
pl: Mierniki i sterowniki przepływu
pt: Medidores e controladores de fluxo
ru: Контроллеры и измерители расхода
sv: Flödesmätare och -regulatorer
tr: Debimetreler ve Akış Kontrol Cihazları

en: Gas Detectors
xx: Gas Detectors
cs: Detektory plynu
da: Gasdetektorer
de: Gasdetektoren
es: Detectores de gas
fr: Détecteurs de gaz
it: Rilevatori di gas
ja: ガス検知器
nl: Detectiegereedschap voor gaslekken
no: Gassdetektorer
pl: Wykrywacze gazu
pt: Ferramentas detectoras de gás
ru: Устройства для обнаружения газа
sv: Gasdetektorer
tr: Gaz Detektörü Araçları

en: Gauges
xx: Gauges
cs: Měřidla
da: Måleredskaber
de: Messinstrumente
es: Calibradores y micrómetros
fr: Manomètres
it: Misuratori
ja: 計器
nl: Meters
no: Måleutstyr
pl: Przyrządy pomiarowe
pt: Manômetros
ru: Измерительные приборы
sv: Mätinstrument
tr: Ölçüm Aletleri

en: Geiger Counters
xx: Geiger Counters
cs: Geigerovy počítače
da: Geigertællere
de: Geigerzähler
es: Contadores Geiger
fr: Compteurs Geiger
it: Contatori geiger
ja: ガイガーカウンター
nl: Geigertellers
no: Geigertellere
pl: Liczniki Geigera
pt: Contadores Geiger
ru: Счетчики Гейгера
sv: Geigermätare
tr: Gayger Sayaçları

en: Hygrometers
xx: Hygrometers
cs: Vlhkoměry
da: Hygrometre
de: Hygrometer
es: Higrómetros
fr: Hygromètres
it: Igrometri
ja: 湿度計
nl: Hygrometers
no: Hygrometre
pl: Higrometry
pt: Higrômetro
ru: Гигрометры
sv: Hygrometrar
tr: Higrometreler

en: Infrared Thermometers
xx: Infrared Thermometers
cs: Infračervené teploměry
da: Infrarøde termometre
de: Infrarotthermometer
es: Termómetros infrarrojos
fr: Thermomètres infrarouges
it: Termometri a infrarossi
ja: 赤外線式温度計
nl: Infraroodthermometers
no: Infrarøde termometre
pl: Termometr na podczerwień
pt: Termômetros infravermelhos
ru: Инфракрасные термометры
sv: Infraröda termometrar
tr: Kızılötesi Termometreler

en: Knife Guides
xx: Knife Guides
cs: Řezací pravítka
da: Knivstyreskinner
de: Messerführungen
es: Guías
fr: Guides pour couteaux
it: Guide coltelli
ja: カッターガイド
nl: Mesgeleiders
no: Knivguider
pl: Prowadnice do noży
pt: Afiadores de facas
ru: Правила для ножей
sv: Knivguider
tr: Bıçak Kılavuzları

en: Levels
xx: Levels
cs: Měřiče rovinnosti
da: Vaterpas
de: Richtwaagen
es: Niveles
fr: Niveaux
it: Livelle
ja: 水準器
nl: Waterpassen
no: Vatere
pl: Poziomice
pt: Níveis
ru: Строительные уровни
sv: Vattenpass och avvägningsmätare
tr: Tesviye Aletleri

en: Bubble Levels
xx: Bubble Levels
cs: Vodováhy
da: Boblevaterpas
de: Wasserwaagen
es: Niveles de burbuja
fr: Niveaux à bulle
it: Livelle a bolla
ja: 気泡管水準器
nl: Waterpassen met vloeistoffen
no: Boblevatere
pl: Poziomice klasyczne
pt: Níveis de bolha
ru: Пузырьковые уровни
sv: Vattenpass
tr: Kabarcıklı Düzeçler

en: Laser Levels
xx: Laser Levels
cs: Laserové vodováhy
da: Laservaterpas
de: Laser-Wasserwaagen
es: Niveles láser
fr: Niveaux laser
it: Livelle laser
ja: レーザー水準器
nl: Waterpasinstrumenten met laser
no: Laservatere
pl: Poziomice laserowe
pt: Níveis a laser
ru: Лазерные строительные уровни
sv: Laserpass
tr: Lazerli Düzeçler

en: Sight Levels
xx: Sight Levels
cs: Nivelizační přístroje
da: Vaterpaskikkert
de: Schaugläser
es: Niveles ópticos
fr: Lunettes de niveau
it: Livelli visivi
ja: オートレベル
nl: Optische waterpassen
no: Siktvatere
pl: Niwelatory optyczne
pt: Linhas de mira
ru: Нивелиры
sv: Avvägningsinstrument
tr: Nivolar

en: Measuring Scales
xx: Measuring Scales
cs: Váhy
da: Vægte
de: Waagen
es: Escalas
fr: Balances
it: Bilance
ja: 秤
nl: Weegschalen
no: Målevekter
pl: Wagi
pt: Escalas de medição
ru: Весы
sv: Vågar
tr: Ölçekler

en: Measuring Wheels
xx: Measuring Wheels
cs: Měřicí kolečka
da: Målehjul
de: Messräder
es: Topómetros
fr: Roues de mesure
it: Ruote di misurazione
ja: 車輪式距離測定器
nl: Meetwielen
no: Målehjul
pl: Kółka miernicze
pt: Rodas de medição
ru: Мерные ролики
sv: Mäthjul
tr: Mesafe Ölçüm Tekerlekleri

en: Moisture Meters
xx: Moisture Meters
cs: Měřiče vlhkosti
da: Fugtmålere
de: Feuchtigkeitsmesser
es: Medidores de humedad
fr: Humidimètres
it: Misuratori di umidità
ja: 水分計
nl: Vochtmeters
no: Fuktighetsmålere
pl: Wilgotnościomierze
pt: Medidores de umidade
ru: Влагомеры
sv: Fuktmätare
tr: Nem Ölçerler

en: Probes & Finders
xx: Probes & Finders
cs: Sondy a vyhledávače
da: Sonder og søgere
de: Sonden & Suchgeräte
es: Sondas y visores
fr: Sondes et détecteurs
it: Sonde e rilevatori
ja: 探知機・検査器
nl: Detectieapparaten
no: Sonder og søkere
pl: Sondy i lokalizatory
pt: Sondas e detectores
ru: Зонды и локаторы
sv: Sonder och sökare
tr: Sondalar ve Bulucular